District of Columbia statutes.
2-361.01

Green procurement.

(a)

Except for emergency procurements, before entering into any contract in excess of $ 100,000, the District shall issue an environmental certification to demonstrate, to the maximum extent practicable, the purchase of an EPPS.

(b)

An environmental certification shall not be required for procurements that conform to an applicable Default Environmental Preference Standard.

(c)

The requirement shall be satisfied if a District solicitation included a requirement that a contractor provide an EPPS.

(d)

Within one year after December 24, 2013, and annually thereafter, OCP shall prepare and submit to the Council a report detailing the progress of this policy, including the following elements:

(1)

Total contracting amount, and percentage of contracting amount, spent on EPPS;

(2)

Successes and challenges to implementing the policy; and

(3)

Changes to policies or standards.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1101, 58 DCR 1185

Cross References

As to applicability of §§ 2-352.06, 2-358.03, and 2-361.01, see § 2-362.03.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-371, § 1203, see § 7015 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-371, § 1203, see § 7015 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Editor's Notes

Section 1203 of D.C. Law 18-371 provided that this section shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 7015 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 18-371, § 1203.

Short Title

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.